Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.023

Youth subject to a dependency proceeding—Review of unexpected or excessive absences—Support for youth's school work.

(1) A school district representative or school employee shall review unexpected or excessive absences with students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding and adults involved with the students, to include the students' caseworkers, educational liaisons, attorneys if appointed, parents or legal guardians, and foster parents or the persons providing placement for the students. The purpose of the review is to determine the cause of the absences, taking into account: Unplanned school transitions, periods of running from care, inpatient treatment, incarceration, school adjustment, educational gaps, psychosocial issues, and unavoidable appointments during the school day. A school district representative or a school employee must proactively support the students' school work so the student does not fall behind and to avoid suspension or expulsion based on truancy.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.510.

[ 2022 c 78 s 2; 2013 c 182 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—2013 c 182: See note following RCW 13.34.030.